Colorado statutes. TITLE 19 Children's Code
PART 13
APPEALS

19-2.5-1301. Appeals.

Appellate procedure is governed by the Colorado appellate rules. Initials must appear on the record on appeal in place of the juvenile's and other respondents' names. Appeals must be advanced on the calendar of the appellate court and decided at the earliest
practical time.

The prosecution in a delinquency case may appeal any decision of the trial court as provided in section 16-12-102.

Source:

L. 2021:
Entire article added with relocations, (SB 21-059), ch. 136, p. 675, § 2, effective October 1.

Editor's note:
This section is similar to former § 19-2-903 as it existed prior to 2021.

19-2.5-1302. Posttrial bail.

A juvenile's application for posttrial bail is governed by part 2 of article 4 of title 16 and section 19-2.5-306, as it relates to bail.

Source:

L. 2021:
Entire article added with relocations, (SB 21-059), ch. 136, p. 675, § 2, effective October 1.

Editor's note:
This section is similar to former § 19-2-904 as it existed prior to 2021.